Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5475YH (6) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2236 Section 1. Section 84A.1B, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Educational attainment of a qualifying credential of 3 at least a bachelorâs degree, or attainment of an initial or 4 intern Iowa teaching license issued under chapter 256 through 5 a pathway to licensure offered by an institution of higher 6 education under the control of the state board of regents or an 7 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183 , 8 Code 2026 . 9 Sec. 2. Section 139A.8B, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 b. âPostsecondary schoolâ means a postsecondary institution 12 under the control of the state board of regents, a community 13 college established under chapter 260C , or an accredited 14 private institution as defined in section 256.183 , Code 2026 . 15 Sec. 3. Section 256.7, subsection 22, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 22. Adopt rules and a procedure for the approval of 18 para-educator preparation programs offered by a public school 19 district, area education agency, community college, institution 20 of higher education under the state board of regents, or an 21 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183, 22 subsection 1 , Code 2026 . The programs shall train and 23 recommend individuals for para-educator certification under 24 section 256.157 . 25 Sec. 4. Section 256.28, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 1. Subject to an appropriation of sufficient funds by 28 the general assembly, the department shall establish a teach 29 Iowa student teaching pilot project in collaboration with 30 two institutions of higher education which offer teacher 31 preparation programs approved by the state board of education 32 pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 . The two institutions 33 of higher education shall include one institution of higher 34 education under the control of the state board of regents 35 -1- LSB 5475YH (6) 91 jda/jh 1/ 7 H.F. 2236 and one accredited private institution as defined in section 1 256.183 , Code 2026 . 2 Sec. 5. Section 256.180, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part , in the 5 event of a national emergency declared by the president of the 6 United States by reason of terrorist attack, the commission may 7 grant temporary relief from requirements rendered infeasible 8 or unreasonable, including due diligence requirements 9 and reporting deadlines, by the national emergency, to an 10 institution of higher education under the state board of 11 regents, a community college, an accredited private institution 12 as defined in section 256.183 , Code 2026, eligible lenders, and 13 other entities participating in the state student assistance 14 programs in accordance with this part , that are located in, 15 or whose operations are directly affected by, areas that 16 are declared disaster areas by any federal, state, or local 17 official in connection with the national emergency. If the 18 commission issues a waiver in accordance with this section , 19 the report prepared by the commission pursuant to section 20 17A.9A, subsection 5 , shall include examples of measures that a 21 postsecondary institution may take in the appropriate exercise 22 of discretion, as provided in 20 U.S.C. Â§1087tt, to adjust 23 financial need and aid eligibility determinations for affected 24 individuals. 25 Sec. 6. Section 256.181, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 2. The general assembly recommends that every public 28 and private institution of higher education in this state, 29 including those institutions referenced in chapters 260C and 30 262 and section 256.183 , Code 2026, post the list of required 31 and suggested textbooks for all courses and the corresponding 32 international standard book numbers for such textbooks at least 33 fourteen days before the start of each semester or term, to the 34 extent possible, at the locations where textbooks are sold on 35 -2- LSB 5475YH (6) 91 jda/jh 2/ 7 H.F. 2236 campus and on the internet site for the respective institution 1 of higher education. 2 Sec. 7. Section 256.183, subsections 1, 3, 5, and 6, Code 3 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. 4 Sec. 8. Section 256.194, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 5 amended by striking the subsections. 6 Sec. 9. Section 256.194, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 4. This section shall not be construed to be a limitation 9 on any of the amounts which may be appropriated by the general 10 assembly for any program enumerated in this section to the 11 commission for deposit in the vocational-technical tuition 12 grants fund established in section 256.192, subsection 8 . 13 Sec. 10. Section 256.203, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 14 amended to read as follows: 15 3. For purposes of this section âgraduate studentâ means 16 a student who has completed at least ninety semester hours, 17 or the trimester or quarter equivalent, of postsecondary 18 course work at a public higher education institution or at 19 an accredited private institution, as defined under section 20 256.183 , Code 2026 . âUnderserved areaâ means a geographical 21 area included on the Iowa governorâs health practitioner 22 shortage area list, which is compiled by the department of 23 health and human services. The commission shall adopt rules, 24 consistent with rules used for students enrolled in higher 25 education institutions under the control of the state board of 26 regents, for purposes of determining Iowa residency status of 27 graduate students under this section . The commission shall 28 also adopt rules which provide standards, guidelines, and 29 procedures for the receipt, processing, and administration of 30 student applications and loans under this section . 31 Sec. 11. Section 256.207, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 1. An eligible postsecondary education institution is 34 an institution of higher education under the state board 35 -3- LSB 5475YH (6) 91 jda/jh 3/ 7 H.F. 2236 of regents, a community college, or an accredited private 1 institution as defined in section 256.183, subsection 1 , 2 Code 2026 . The commission may enter into an agreement with 3 an eligible postsecondary education institution under which 4 the commission will make grants to the institution for the 5 work-study program. 6 Sec. 12. Section 256.210, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 d. Is enrolled as an undergraduate student in a community 9 college as defined in section 260C.2 , an institution of higher 10 learning under the control of the board of regents, or an 11 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183 , 12 Code 2026, and is maintaining satisfactory academic progress. 13 Sec. 13. Section 256.210A, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 14 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 d. Is enrolled in an educational program that has been 16 approved by the adjutant general and is offered by a community 17 college as defined in section 260C.2 , an institution of higher 18 learning under the control of the board of regents, or an 19 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183 , 20 2026 . 21 Sec. 14. Section 256.214, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 1. âAccredited private institutionâ means an institution of 24 higher education as defined in section 256.183, subsection 1 , 25 Code 2026 . 26 Sec. 15. Section 256.219, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 1. A teacher shortage forgivable loan program is 29 established to be administered by the college student aid 30 commission. An individual is eligible for the forgivable 31 loan program if the individual is a resident of this state 32 who is enrolled as a sophomore, junior, senior, or graduate 33 student in an approved practitioner preparation program in a 34 designated area in which teacher shortages are anticipated at 35 -4- LSB 5475YH (6) 91 jda/jh 4/ 7 H.F. 2236 an institution of higher learning under the control of the 1 state board of regents or an accredited private institution as 2 defined in section 256.183 , Code 2026 . 3 Sec. 16. Section 256.228, subsection 1, paragraph e, 4 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 âEligible institutionâ means a community college as defined 7 in section 260C.2 or an accredited private institution as 8 defined in section 256.183 , Code 2026, that meets all of the 9 following criteria: 10 Sec. 17. Section 256.229, subsection 1, paragraph c, 11 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher 14 learning governed by the state board of regents, an accredited 15 private institution as defined in section 256.183 , Code 2026, 16 or an approved virtual institution, that meets all of the 17 following criteria: 18 Sec. 18. Section 261B.11, subsection 1, paragraph j, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 j. Higher education institutions that meet the criteria 21 established under section 256.183, subsection 1 , Code 2026 . 22 Sec. 19. Section 261E.2, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 4. âEligible postsecondary institutionâ means an institution 25 of higher learning under the control of the state board of 26 regents, a community college established under chapter 260C , 27 or an accredited private institution as defined in section 28 256.183 , Code 2026 . 29 Sec. 20. Section 261G.2, subsection 5, paragraph c, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 c. An accredited private institution as defined in section 32 256.183 , Code 2026 . 33 Sec. 21. Section 297.24, subsection 3, paragraph h, Code 34 2026, is amended to read as follows: 35 -5- LSB 5475YH (6) 91 jda/jh 5/ 7 H.F. 2236 h. An accredited private institution as defined in section 1 256.183 , Code 2026 . 2 Sec. 22. Section 714.19, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 9. Private, nonprofit schools that meet the criteria 5 established under section 256.183, subsection 1 , Code 2026 . 6 Sec. 23. TRANSFERS FROM IOWA TUITION GRANTS FUND AND 7 IOWA TUITION GRANTS FOR-PROFIT INSTITUTIONS FUND TO GENERAL 8 FUND. There is transferred from the Iowa tuition grants fund 9 established pursuant to section 256.189, subsection 3, and the 10 Iowa tuition grants for-profit institutions fund established 11 pursuant to section 256.191, subsection 8, to the general fund 12 of the state all unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining 13 on the effective date of this Act. 14 Sec. 24. REPEAL. Sections 256.184, 256.185, 256.186, 15 256.187, 256.189, and 256.191, Code 2026, are repealed. 16 Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of 17 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 18